Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
Article 11. Benefits.
§ 71-5-545.
Self-Employment Assistance Program.

Definitions.As used in this section:

“Self-employment assistance activities” means activities (including entrepreneurial training, business counseling, technical assistance and any other requirements set forth by the executive director in regulation) approved by the executive director in which an individual, identified through an established system consistent with the system requirements of Section 303(j)(1)(A) of the Social Security Act (SSA) as likely to exhaust regular unemployment benefits, participates for the purpose of establishing a business and becoming self-employed.

“Self-employment assistance allowance” means an allowance, payable in lieu of, and on the same schedule as, regular benefits and from the unemployment fund established under Section 71-5-451, to an individual participating in self-employment assistance activities who meets the requirements of this section.

“Regular benefits” means benefits payable to an individual under this chapter (including benefits payable to Federal civilian employees and to ex-service members pursuant to 5 USC Chapter 85) excluding emergency unemployment benefits and extended benefits.

“Full-time basis” shall have the meaning contained in regulations prescribed by the executive director who has authority to set, modify and rescind such regulations as are required for the proper and efficient administration of this section.

“SEAP” means the Self-Employment Assistance Program.

Amount of self-employment assistance allowance.The weekly allowance payable under this section to an individual shall be equal to the weekly benefit amount for regular benefits otherwise payable under Section 71-5-503.

The sum of (a) the allowance paid under this section, and (b) regular benefits paid under this chapter with respect to any benefit year shall not exceed the maximum benefit amount as established by Section 71-5-507 with respect to such benefit year.

Eligibility for self-employment assistance allowance.The allowance described in subsection (1) of this section shall be payable to an individual at the same interval, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as regular benefits under this chapter, except that:

The requirements of Sections 71-5-511 and 71-5-513 relating to availability for work, active search for work, and refusal to accept work are not applicable to an individual while engaged in establishment of a business;

The requirements of Section 71-5-505 relating to other earnings are not applicable to income earned from self-employment by such individual while engaged in establishment of a business;

An individual who meets the requirements of this section shall be considered to be unemployed under Section 71-5-501 et seq.; and

An individual who fails to participate in self-employment assistance activities as prescribed by this section or by the executive director, or who fails to actively engage on a full-time basis in activities (which may include training) relating to the establishment of a business and becoming self-employed, shall be disqualified for any week in which the failure occurs.

Limitation on receipt of self-employment assistance allowances.The aggregate number of individuals receiving the allowance under this section at any time shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the number of individuals receiving regular benefits as defined in Section 71-5-541.

Steering committee membership.The executive director shall appoint a steering committee. Each member of the steering committee shall have equal voting rights on the SEAP Steering Committee. The voting members of the board who are not state employees or state elected officials shall be entitled to reimbursement of their reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out their duties under this chapter, from any funds available for that purpose.

Steering committee purpose.The steering committee shall initially adopt the rules of operation for the SEAP and shall select and certify SEAP training programs. The rules shall be enforced by the department. Rules shall include the continuing role of the steering committee. Participants in training programs that are not certified by the SEAP shall not be paid SEAP benefits and any benefits paid to them shall be considered overpaid and shall be due to be repaid to the department and the Unemployment Trust Fund.

Rules and regulations for operation of SEAP by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security.The executive director shall cause regulations adopted by the SEAP Steering Committee to be adopted by the department and the executive director may adopt other regulations as necessary for proper administration of this section.

Financing costs of self-employment assistance allowances.Allowances paid under this section shall not be charged to employers as provided under provisions of this chapter relating to the noncharging of regular benefits as defined in Section 71-5-541, and shall be used in the computation of the annual unemployment tax rate as noncharges for receipt of unemployment benefits paid by this chapter. Noncharging provisions do not apply to unemployment compensation for federal employees, unemployment compensation for ex-servicemen or unemployment compensation paid to individuals based upon their wages earned with reimbursing employers, except as allowed by Section 71-5-357(b)(iv). In the event federal regulations allow changes to noncharging provisions associated with the SEAP, regulations may be adopted by the SEAP Steering Committee to make such changes as are reasonable and appropriate to the Mississippi program and charging or not charging of SEAP benefits.

Federal law and regulations. — Federal law and regulations.Nothing in this section or the rules adopted related to this section or any other provision of this chapter is intended to be inconsistent with laws and regulations prescribed by the United States Department of Labor. Any part of this section or this chapter that is determined to not be in conformity with United State Department of labor regulations and applicable federal laws will not be enforced until such time as the deficiencies can be remedied.

Effective date and termination date.The provisions of this section will apply to weeks beginning on or after the first Sunday sixty (60) days following passage, or after any plan required by the United States Department of Labor is approved by such department, whichever date is later. The authority provided by this section shall terminate as of the end of the week preceding the date when federal law no longer authorizes the provisions of this section, unless such date is a Saturday in which case the authority shall terminate as of such date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 2012.